Massachusetts, session 194th, H2832.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection 2, in subdivision (a) by striking out the first
3 table after line 139 and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Age Last Birthday at Date of
Retirement
Per Cent. Group 1. Group 2. Group 4.
4.65 …................. 80 — —
4.50 …................. 79 — —
4.45 …................. 78 — —
1 of 3

4.30 …................. 77 — —
4.15 …................. 76 — —
4.00 …................. 75 — —
3.85 …................. 74 — —
3.70 …................. 73 — —
3.55 …................. 72 — —
3.40 …................. 71 — —
3.25 …................. 70 — —
3.10 …................. 69 — —
2.95 …................. 68 — —
2.80 …................. 67 — —
2.65 …................. 66 — —
2.50 …................. 65 60 or over 55 or over
2.40 …................. 64 59 54
2.30 …................. 63 58 53
2.20 …................. 62 57 52
2.10 …................. 61 56 51
2.00 …................. 60 55 50
1.90 …................. 59 — 49
1.80 …................. 58 — 48
1.70 …................. 57 — 47
1.60 …................. 56 — 46
1.50 …................. 55 — 45
2 of 3

4 SECTION 2. Said section 5 of said chapter 32 is hereby amended by inserting, at the end thereof,
5 the following:-
6 (g)The Massachusetts Teachers’ Retirement system shall recalculate the annual pension benefits
7 of all members who retired over the age of 65 consistent with the tables in this section.
8 SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect upon passage of this act.
3 of 3